Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.090

Amendment of articles.

The members, at any meeting called for the purpose, may amend the articles of incorporation of the association by a majority vote of the members present, in person or in proxy. The amended articles shall be filed with the director and be subject to the same procedure of approval, refusal, appeal, and filing with the secretary of state as provided for the original articles of incorporation. Proposed amendments of the articles of incorporation shall be submitted to the director at least thirty days prior to the meeting of the members.

If the amendments include a change in the association's corporate name, the association shall give notice by mail to each association doing business within this state at its principal place of business of the filing of the amended articles. Persons interested in protesting an amendment changing the association's corporate name may contact the director in person or by writing prior to a date which shall be given in the notice.

[ 1994 c 92 s 432; 1982 c 3 s 20; 1981 c 302 s 32; 1979 c 113 s 2; 1945 c 235 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-129. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 9, 10; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 1; 1913 c 110 s 1; 1903 c 116 s 1; 1890 p 56 ss 16, 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.

Severability—1979 c 113: See note following RCW 33.04.020.